data/paradigms.lexd
PATTERNS
StemsN_P10_x[gFem] InflN_P10_x[gFem]
StemsN_P10_x[gMsc] InflN_P10_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P10_x[gNeut] InflN_P10_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P11_x[gFem] InflN_P11_x[gFem]
StemsN_P11_x[gMsc] InflN_P11_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P11_x[gNeut] InflN_P11_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P115_x[gFem] InflN_P115_x[gFem]
StemsN_P115_x[gNeut] InflN_P115_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P118_x[gFem] InflN_P118_x[gFem]
StemsN_P118_x[gNeut] InflN_P118_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P12_x[gMsc] InflN_P12_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P13_x[gFem] InflN_P13_x[gFem]
StemsN_P14_x[gNeut] InflN_P14_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P15_x[gFem] InflN_P15_x[gFem]
StemsN_P15_x[gMsc] InflN_P15_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P15_x[gNeut] InflN_P15_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P16_x[gFem] InflN_P16_x[gFem]
StemsN_P16_x[gMsc] InflN_P16_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P16_x[gNeut] InflN_P16_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P17_x[gFem] InflN_P17_x[gFem]
StemsN_P17_x[gMsc] InflN_P17_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P17_x[gNeut] InflN_P17_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P18_x[gFem] InflN_P18_x[gFem]
StemsN_P18_x[gMsc] InflN_P18_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P18_x[gNeut] InflN_P18_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P19_x[gFem] InflN_P19_x[gFem]
StemsN_P19_x[gMsc] InflN_P19_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P19_x[gNeut] InflN_P19_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P20_x[gFem] InflN_P20_x[gFem]
StemsN_P20_x[gMsc] InflN_P20_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P20_x[gNeut] InflN_P20_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P21_x[gFem] InflN_P21_x[gFem]
StemsN_P21_x[gMsc] InflN_P21_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P21_x[gNeut] InflN_P21_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P22_x[gFem] InflN_P22_x[gFem]
StemsN_P22_x[gMsc] InflN_P22_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P22_x[gNeut] InflN_P22_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P23_x[gFem] InflN_P23_x[gFem]
StemsN_P23_x[gMsc] InflN_P23_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P23_x[gNeut] InflN_P23_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P24_x[gFem] InflN_P24_x[gFem]
StemsN_P24_x[gMsc] InflN_P24_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P24_x[gNeut] InflN_P24_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P25_x[gFem] InflN_P25_x[gFem]
StemsN_P25_x[gMsc] InflN_P25_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P25_x[gNeut] InflN_P25_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P25comp_x[gFem] InflN_P25comp_x[gFem]
StemsN_P25comp_x[gMsc] InflN_P25comp_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P25comp_x[gNeut] InflN_P25comp_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P25comp_suppl_x[gFem] InflN_P25comp_suppl_x[gFem]
StemsN_P25comp_suppl_x[gMsc] InflN_P25comp_suppl_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P25comp_suppl_x[gNeut] InflN_P25comp_suppl_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P25comp_suppl2_x[gFem] InflN_P25comp_suppl2_x[gFem]
StemsN_P25comp_suppl2_x[gMsc] InflN_P25comp_suppl2_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P25comp_suppl2_x[gNeut] InflN_P25comp_suppl2_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P25sup_x[gFem] InflN_P25sup_x[gFem]
StemsN_P25sup_x[gMsc] InflN_P25sup_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P25sup_x[gNeut] InflN_P25sup_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P25sup_suppl_x[gFem] InflN_P25sup_suppl_x[gFem]
StemsN_P25sup_suppl_x[gMsc] InflN_P25sup_suppl_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P25sup_suppl_x[gNeut] InflN_P25sup_suppl_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P25sup_suppl2_x[gFem] InflN_P25sup_suppl2_x[gFem]
StemsN_P25sup_suppl2_x[gMsc] InflN_P25sup_suppl2_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P25sup_suppl2_x[gNeut] InflN_P25sup_suppl2_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P26_x[gFem] InflN_P26_x[gFem]
StemsN_P26_x[gMsc] InflN_P26_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P26_x[gNeut] InflN_P26_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P26comp_x[gFem] InflN_P26comp_x[gFem]
StemsN_P26comp_x[gMsc] InflN_P26comp_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P26comp_x[gNeut] InflN_P26comp_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P26comp_suppl_x[gFem] InflN_P26comp_suppl_x[gFem]
StemsN_P26comp_suppl_x[gMsc] InflN_P26comp_suppl_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P26comp_suppl_x[gNeut] InflN_P26comp_suppl_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P26sup_x[gFem] InflN_P26sup_x[gFem]
StemsN_P26sup_x[gMsc] InflN_P26sup_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P26sup_x[gNeut] InflN_P26sup_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P26sup_suppl_x[gFem] InflN_P26sup_suppl_x[gFem]
StemsN_P26sup_suppl_x[gMsc] InflN_P26sup_suppl_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P26sup_suppl_x[gNeut] InflN_P26sup_suppl_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P27_x[gFem] InflN_P27_x[gFem]
StemsN_P27_x[gMsc] InflN_P27_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P27_x[gNeut] InflN_P27_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P27comp_x[gFem] InflN_P27comp_x[gFem]
StemsN_P27comp_x[gMsc] InflN_P27comp_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P27comp_x[gNeut] InflN_P27comp_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P27sup_x[gFem] InflN_P27sup_x[gFem]
StemsN_P27sup_x[gMsc] InflN_P27sup_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P27sup_x[gNeut] InflN_P27sup_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P28_x[gFem] InflN_P28_x[gFem]
StemsN_P28_x[gMsc] InflN_P28_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P28_x[gNeut] InflN_P28_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P28sup_x[gFem] InflN_P28sup_x[gFem]
StemsN_P28sup_x[gMsc] InflN_P28sup_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P28sup_x[gNeut] InflN_P28sup_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P29_x[gFem] InflN_P29_x[gFem]
StemsN_P29_x[gMsc] InflN_P29_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P29_x[gNeut] InflN_P29_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P29comp_x[gFem] InflN_P29comp_x[gFem]
StemsN_P29comp_x[gMsc] InflN_P29comp_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P29comp_x[gNeut] InflN_P29comp_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P29sup_x[gFem] InflN_P29sup_x[gFem]
StemsN_P29sup_x[gMsc] InflN_P29sup_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P29sup_x[gNeut] InflN_P29sup_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P30_x[gFem] InflN_P30_x[gFem]
StemsN_P30_x[gMsc] InflN_P30_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P30_x[gNeut] InflN_P30_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P30a_x[gFem] InflN_P30a_x[gFem]
StemsN_P30a_x[gMsc] InflN_P30a_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P30a_x[gNeut] InflN_P30a_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P30acomp_x[gFem] InflN_P30acomp_x[gFem]
StemsN_P30acomp_x[gMsc] InflN_P30acomp_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P30acomp_x[gNeut] InflN_P30acomp_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P30asup_x[gFem] InflN_P30asup_x[gFem]
StemsN_P30asup_x[gMsc] InflN_P30asup_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P30asup_x[gNeut] InflN_P30asup_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P30comp_x[gFem] InflN_P30comp_x[gFem]
StemsN_P30comp_x[gMsc] InflN_P30comp_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P30comp_x[gNeut] InflN_P30comp_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P30sup_x[gFem] InflN_P30sup_x[gFem]
StemsN_P30sup_x[gMsc] InflN_P30sup_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P30sup_x[gNeut] InflN_P30sup_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P31_x[gFem] InflN_P31_x[gFem]
StemsN_P31_x[gMsc] InflN_P31_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P31_x[gNeut] InflN_P31_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P31comp_x[gFem] InflN_P31comp_x[gFem]
StemsN_P31comp_x[gMsc] InflN_P31comp_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P31comp_x[gNeut] InflN_P31comp_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P31sup_x[gFem] InflN_P31sup_x[gFem]
StemsN_P31sup_x[gMsc] InflN_P31sup_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P31sup_x[gNeut] InflN_P31sup_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P32_x[gMsc] InflN_P32_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P33_x[gMsc] InflN_P33_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P34_x[gMsc] InflN_P34_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P35_x[gNeut] InflN_P35_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P35a_x[gNeut] InflN_P35a_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P36_x[gMsc] InflN_P36_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P37_x[gNeut] InflN_P37_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P37a_x[gNeut] InflN_P37a_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P38_x[gMsc] InflN_P38_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P39_x[gMsc] InflN_P39_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P40_x[gMsc] InflN_P40_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P40a_x[gMsc] InflN_P40a_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P40b_x[gMsc] InflN_P40b_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P40c_x[gMsc] InflN_P40c_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P41_x[gMsc] InflN_P41_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P42_x[gMsc] InflN_P42_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P43_x[gMsc] InflN_P43_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P44_x[gNeut] InflN_P44_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P45_x[gFem] InflN_P45_x[gFem]
StemsN_P46_x[gFem] InflN_P46_x[gFem]
StemsN_P47_x[gMsc] InflN_P47_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P48_x[gFem] InflN_P48_x[gFem]
StemsN_P49_x[gFem] InflN_P49_x[gFem]
StemsN_P50_x[gFem] InflN_P50_x[gFem]
StemsN_P50a_x[gFem] InflN_P50a_x[gFem]
StemsN_P51_x[gFem] InflN_P51_x[gFem]
StemsN_P51a_x[gFem] InflN_P51a_x[gFem]
StemsN_P52_x[gFem] InflN_P52_x[gFem]
StemsN_P53_x[gFem] InflN_P53_x[gFem]
StemsN_P54_x[gMsc] InflN_P54_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P55_x[gMsc] InflN_P55_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P56_x[gMsc] InflN_P56_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P57_x[gMsc] InflN_P57_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P58_x[gFem] InflN_P58_x[gFem]
StemsN_P59_x[gNeut] InflN_P59_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P60_x[gFem] InflN_P60_x[gFem]
StemsN_P61_x[gMsc] InflN_P61_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P62_x[gMsc] InflN_P62_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P63_x[gNeut] InflN_P63_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P64_x[gMsc] InflN_P64_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P65_x[gMsc] InflN_P65_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P66_x[gFem] InflN_P66_x[gFem]
StemsN_P67_x[gFem] InflN_P67_x[gFem]
StemsN_P70_x[gFem] InflN_P70_x[gFem]
StemsN_P70_x[gMsc] InflN_P70_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P70_x[gNeut] InflN_P70_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P9_x[gFem] InflN_P9_x[gFem]
StemsN_P9_x[gMsc] InflN_P9_x[gMsc]
StemsN_P9_x[gNeut] InflN_P9_x[gNeut]
StemsN_P1_x InflN_P1_x
StemsN_P115_x InflN_P115_x
StemsN_P118_x InflN_P118_x
StemsN_P2_x InflN_P2_x
StemsV_P100_present InflV_P100_present
StemsV_P100_preterite InflV_P100_preterite
StemsV_P102_present InflV_P102_present
StemsV_P102_preterite InflV_P102_preterite
StemsV_P102a_present InflV_P102a_present
StemsV_P102a_preterite InflV_P102a_preterite
StemsV_P105_present InflV_P105_present
StemsV_P105_preterite InflV_P105_preterite
StemsV_P106a_pres_stem InflV_P106a_pres_stem
StemsV_P106b_present InflV_P106b_present
StemsV_P106b_preterite InflV_P106b_preterite
StemsV_P106c_pres_stem InflV_P106c_pres_stem
StemsV_P106d_present InflV_P106d_present
StemsV_P106d_preterite InflV_P106d_preterite
StemsV_P107_present InflV_P107_present
StemsV_P107_preterite InflV_P107_preterite
StemsV_P108_present InflV_P108_present
StemsV_P108_preterite InflV_P108_preterite
StemsV_P109_present InflV_P109_present
StemsV_P109_preterite InflV_P109_preterite
StemsV_P110_present InflV_P110_present
StemsV_P110_preterite InflV_P110_preterite
StemsV_P111_present InflV_P111_present
StemsV_P111_preterite InflV_P111_preterite
StemsV_P112_present InflV_P112_present
StemsV_P112_preterite InflV_P112_preterite
StemsV_P113_present InflV_P113_present
StemsV_P113_preterite InflV_P113_preterite
StemsV_P114_present InflV_P114_present
StemsV_P114_preterite InflV_P114_preterite
StemsV_P115_inf_stem InflV_P115_inf_stem
StemsV_P115_present InflV_P115_present
StemsV_P115_preterite InflV_P115_preterite
StemsV_P116_present InflV_P116_present
StemsV_P116_preterite InflV_P116_preterite
StemsV_P117_present InflV_P117_present
StemsV_P117_preterite InflV_P117_preterite
StemsV_P118_pres_stem InflV_P118_pres_stem
StemsV_P119_present InflV_P119_present
StemsV_P119_preterite InflV_P119_preterite
StemsV_P120_present InflV_P120_present
StemsV_P120_preterite InflV_P120_preterite
StemsV_P121_present InflV_P121_present
StemsV_P121_preterite InflV_P121_preterite
StemsV_P122_pres_stem InflV_P122_pres_stem
StemsV_P123_present InflV_P123_present
StemsV_P123_preterite InflV_P123_preterite
StemsV_P124_present InflV_P124_present
StemsV_P124_preterite InflV_P124_preterite
StemsV_P125_present InflV_P125_present
StemsV_P125_preterite InflV_P125_preterite
StemsV_P126_pres_stem InflV_P126_pres_stem
StemsV_P127_pres_stem InflV_P127_pres_stem
StemsV_P128_present InflV_P128_present
StemsV_P128_preterite InflV_P128_preterite
StemsV_P131_pres_stem InflV_P131_pres_stem
StemsV_P132_pres_stem InflV_P132_pres_stem
StemsV_P133_pres_stem InflV_P133_pres_stem
StemsV_P134_pres_stem InflV_P134_pres_stem
StemsV_P134a_pres_stem InflV_P134a_pres_stem
StemsV_P135_present InflV_P135_present
StemsV_P135_preterite InflV_P135_preterite
StemsV_P136_pres_stem InflV_P136_pres_stem
StemsV_P137_present InflV_P137_present
StemsV_P137_preterite InflV_P137_preterite
StemsV_P137a_present InflV_P137a_present
StemsV_P137a_preterite InflV_P137a_preterite
StemsV_P138_pres_stem InflV_P138_pres_stem
StemsV_P139_pres_stem InflV_P139_pres_stem
StemsV_P140_present InflV_P140_present
StemsV_P140_preterite InflV_P140_preterite
StemsV_P141_present InflV_P141_present
StemsV_P141_preterite InflV_P141_preterite
StemsV_P142_present InflV_P142_present
StemsV_P142_preterite InflV_P142_preterite
StemsV_P143_pres_stem InflV_P143_pres_stem
StemsV_P144_present InflV_P144_present
StemsV_P144_preterite InflV_P144_preterite
StemsV_P71_imperative InflV_P71_imperative
StemsV_P71_inf_stem InflV_P71_inf_stem
StemsV_P71_pres_stem InflV_P71_pres_stem
StemsV_P72_pres_stem InflV_P72_pres_stem
StemsV_P73_pres_stem InflV_P73_pres_stem
StemsV_P74_pres_stem InflV_P74_pres_stem
StemsV_P75_pres_stem InflV_P75_pres_stem
StemsV_P76_pres_stem InflV_P76_pres_stem
StemsV_P76s_pres_stem InflV_P76s_pres_stem
StemsV_P77_present InflV_P77_present
StemsV_P77_preterite InflV_P77_preterite
StemsV_P78_present InflV_P78_present
StemsV_P78_preterite InflV_P78_preterite
StemsV_P79_present InflV_P79_present
StemsV_P79_preterite InflV_P79_preterite
StemsV_P80b_present InflV_P80b_present
StemsV_P80b_preterite InflV_P80b_preterite
StemsV_P81_present InflV_P81_present
StemsV_P81_preterite InflV_P81_preterite
StemsV_P81a_present InflV_P81a_present
StemsV_P81a_preterite InflV_P81a_preterite
StemsV_P81b_present InflV_P81b_present
StemsV_P81b_preterite InflV_P81b_preterite
StemsV_P81c_present InflV_P81c_present
StemsV_P81c_preterite InflV_P81c_preterite
StemsV_P81d_present InflV_P81d_present
StemsV_P81d_preterite InflV_P81d_preterite
StemsV_P82_present InflV_P82_present
StemsV_P82_preterite InflV_P82_preterite
StemsV_P82a_present InflV_P82a_present
